Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 2
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Article 1

General Provisions.

Article 2

Board of Natural Resources.

Editor's notes.

- By resolution (Ga. L. 1991, p. 1236), the General Assembly directed the commissioner of natural resources to dedicate the Department of Natural Resources Regional Headquarters Building in Brunswick, Georgia in honor of Samuel Thomas Coffer.

Cross references.

- Community greenspace preservation, T. 36, C. 22.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Organization and public participation, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-1-1 et seq.

Agricultural Nonpoint Source Grants, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Soil and Water Conservation Commission, Grants, Subject 600-5-5.